dictsource/nog_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Nogai

// Vowels
.L01 а ы о у
.L02 е и аь оь уь э
.L03 я ю ё

// Consonants
.L04 б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ

.group а
        а        A
        а (_        'A
        а (L04_        'A
        аь       &
        аь (L04_       '&
        аман (_	'AmAn
        амыз (_	'Am@z
        айман (_	'AjmAn
        аймыз (_	'Ajm@z
        асынъ (_	'As@N
        ады (_	'Ad@
        айсынъ (_	'Ajs@N
        айды (_	'Ajd@
        ав (_	'Aw

.group б
        б        b
        б (_	p

.group в
        в        v
   L01) в        w
   L02) в        v
   L03) в        w
   L01) в (_     w
   L02) в (_     v
   L03) в (_     w

.group г
        г        g
        г (L01   G
        г (L02   g
   L01) г        G
   L01) г (_     G
   L01) г (L02   g
   L02) г        g
   L03) г        G
   L02) г (_     g
   L03) г (_     G
   га (_	G'A
   ге (_	g'e
   ган (_	G'An
   ген (_	g'en
   гоь	g8
   гуь	gu#
   г (_	k

.group д
        д        d
        дж       dZ
        дынъ (_	d'@N
        динъ (_	d'IN
        ды (_	d'@
        ди (_	d'I
        да (_	d'A
        де (_	d'e
        дан (_	d'An
        ден (_	d'en
        д	(_	t

.group е
        е        e
   L01) е        je
   L02) е        je
   L03) е        je
     _) е        je
     е (_	'e
     е (C_        'e
   L01) е (_        j'e
   L02) е (_        j'e
   L03) е (_        j'e
   емен (_	'emen
   емиз (_	'emIz
   еймен (_	'ejmen
   еймиз (_	'ejmIz
   есинъ (_	'esIN
   ейсинъ (_	'ejsIN
   еди (_	'edI
   ейди (_	'ejdI
   ев (_	'ev
   есиз (_	'esIz

.group ё
        ё        j'o

.group ж
        ж        Z
        ж (_	S

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        I
        и (_        'I
        и (L04_	'I
        ин (_	'In

.group й
        й        j

.group к
        к        k
        к (L01   q
        к (L02   k
   L01) к        q
   L01) к (_     q
   L01) к (L02   k
   L02) к        k
   L02) к (_     k
   L03) к        q
   L03) к (_     q
   ка (_	q'A
   ке (_	k'e
   кан (_	q'An
   кен (_	k'en
   коь	k8
   куь	ku#

.group л
        л        l
        л (L01   L
        л (L02   l
   L01) л        L
   L01) л (_     L
   L01) л (L02   l
   L02) л        l
   L02) л (_     l
   L03) л        L
   L03) л (_     L
   лар (_	L'AR
   лер (_	l'eR
   лоь	l8
   луь	lu#

.group м
        м        m
        мас (_	m'As
        мес (_	m'es
        ман (_	=mAn
        мен (_	=men
        мыз (_	=m@z
        миз (_	=mIz
        майман (_	=mAjmAn
        майсынъ (_	=mAjs@N
        майды (_	=mAjd@
        меймен (_	=mejmen
        мейсинъ (_	=mejsIN
        мейди (_	=mejdI
        

.group н
        н        n
        нъ       N
        нынъ (_	n'@N
        нинъ (_	n'IN
        ны (_	n'@
        ни (_	n'I
        на (_	n'A
        не (_	n'e
        нар (_	n'AR
        нер (_	n'eR

.group о
        о        o
        оь       8

.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        R

.group с
        с        s
        сам (_	s'Am
        санъ (_	s'AN
        са (_	s'A
        санъыз (_	s'AN@z
        салар (_	sAL'AR
        сем (_	s'em
        сенъ (_	s'eN
        сенъиз (_	seN'Iz
        селер (_	sel'eR
        сыз (_	s'@z
        сиз (_	s'Iz

.group т
        т        t
        тынъ (_	t'@N
        тинъ (_	t'IN
        ты (_	t'@
        ти (_	t'I
        та (_	t'A
        те (_	t'e

.group у
        у        U
        уь       u#
        у (L04_        'U
        уь (L04_       'u#
        ув (_	'Uw
        уьв (_	'u#v

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS

.group ш
        ш        S

.group щ
        щ        S;

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        @
        ы (_        '@
        ы (L04_        '@
        ын (_	'@n

.group ь
        ь        ?

.group э
        э        e
        _) э (L04_        'e

.group ю
        ю        ju
        ю (L04_        j'u

.group я
        я        jA
        я (L04_        j'A
